src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages

# Verb conjugation

## Basic lexica for bisyllabic verbs

### Modals

These are treated separately because
modals do not participate in derivation

* **LEXICON GALGA_IV** only dáidit, galgat

* **LEXICON FERTE_IV**  only fertet and bállet

### Ordinary bisyllabic verbs

* **LEXICON VUOVDI_TV** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong

* **LEXICON ADDI_TV** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong

* **LEXICON BOAHTI_IV**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, diphthong

* **LEXICON CIVKI_IV**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, monophthong

* **LEXICON DIEHTI-VERB** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON BOAHTI-VERB** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON DIEVVA_IV**  Bisyllabic a-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, diphthong

* **LEXICON DIEVVA-VERB**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, diphthong

* **LEXICON BIEHKU-VERB**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, diphthong

* **LEXICON BORRA_TV** Bisyllabic a-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong

* **LEXICON DEAIVA_TV** Bisyllabic a-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong

* **LEXICON BORRA-VERB** Bisyllabic a-verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON DOALVU-VERB** Bisyllabic u-verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON GAIKU_TV** Bisyllabic u-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong

* **LEXICON DOALVU_TV** Bisyllabic u-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong

* **LEXICON BIEHKU_IV**  Bisyllabic u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg (biehkut - biehkku), diphthong

### Bisyllabic verbs

* **LEXICON DEAKCU_TV** as BORRA for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs with dim -istit that are hardcoded

* **LEXICON BOAZZU_IV** as DIEVVA_IV for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs with dim -istit that are hardcoded

* **LEXICON BINDU_IV** as DIEVVA (but without short passive) for u-verbs with dim -astit, that are hardcoded

* **LEXICON DAHTU_TV**  As diehti, but -ut verbs, thus without short passive

* **LEXICON BOLTU_TV**  As DAHTU_TV but with dim -astit that are harcoded

* **LEXICON ALLU_IV**  -ut verbs, thus without short passive

* **LEXICON DIEHTALADDA_TV** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat and -httit) - no deverbal verbs

* **LEXICON LAIGOHADDA_TV** láigohaddat. No deverbal nouns for speller reasons. No +Imprt+Pl2: láigohaddit

* **LEXICON HAHTTIT_TV** Four-syll kausatives on -httit

* **LEXICON BOAHTALADDA_IV** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)

* **LEXICON RAIMMAHALLA_IV** passives on -hallat and INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat

* **LEXICON UVVA_IV** passives -uvvat

* **LEXICON UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot** passives -uvvat, with no possible -uvvot derived from -it

* **LEXICON SMUVVA_IV** passives -snuvvat, -smuvvat

* **LEXICON DOAROSTUVVA_TV** INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat

* **LEXICON MAHTALADDA_TV** Bisyllabic Already derived words (except words ending -uššat) without Personal Passive but with Acc obj

* **LEXICON ARVI_IV** Bisyllabic Impersonal Verbs

* **LEXICON ARVALADDA_IV** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)

* **LEXICON MASSI_TV** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive. Otherwise like VUOVDI_TV

* **LEXICON VALDI_TV**  No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive. No VGen. Otherwise like VUOVDI_TV

* **LEXICON ASTA_TV** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive. Otherwise like BORRA_TV

* **LEXICON BORGI_IV**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Otherwise like BOAHTI_IV

* **LEXICON BEALLJA_IV** No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. Otherwise like DIEVVA_IV

* **LEXICON DAVGU_TV**  As DAHTU_TV, No Der/NomAg for speller reasons.

* **LEXICON LEABBU_TV** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons)- otherwise like DEAKCU_TV

* **LEXICON ALBMU_TV** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). As BOLTU_TV otherwise

* **LEXICON BARGU_IV**  no Der/NomAg for speller reasons- Like ALLU_IV

* **LEXICON BORSU_IV** as BINDU. No Der/NomAg

* **LEXICON MUHTTI_TV** No deverbal nouns an ACTIO(for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON BEAHTTI_TV** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, no Der/alla, no Der/adda, Der/halla  (beahtáhallat, báinnáhallat) for speller and no Cmp for noun derivations to avoid e.g. borrabeahttit

* **LEXICON FAHTE_TV** Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive,  no Der/alla, no Der/adda, Der/halla  (fáhtehallin) for speller

* **LEXICON GILVI_TV** only gilvit, to get rid of gilvohallat (for speller reasons).

* **LEXICON FAHTI_TV** (for speller reasons). no fáhttet (fáhtit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2) because it get mixed up with fáhtet. No deverbal nouns.

* **LEXICON DAHKA_TV** Like BORRA_TV, but without	dahkat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg1, to get rid of dahkon (for speller reasons)

* **LEXICON FALLA_TV** fállat, njoarrat,  to get rid of fálastallat, njoarastallat (for speller reasons).

* **LEXICON OAHPPA_TV** only oahppat. Like BORRA but without Deverbal verb -stuvva (for speller reasons)

* **LEXICON AKTI_IV**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg - for speller reasons, to prevent:

* **LEXICON GUHKKA_IV** No Imprt+Pl2 on -it, no Imprt+ConNegII and No +Der/NomAg for speller reasons. No Deverbal Verbs either. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive

* **LEXICON BARDNA_IV** "bárdnat" ----> potensialis removed; bártnažan, bártnažat, bártnaš, bártnaža. No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. Otherwise like DIEVVA_IV

* **LEXICON DUSSA_IV**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Passive and Der/NomAg, get rid of duššo

* **LEXICON DIEHTISHORT_TV** Short action noun compound-form: neasken-

* **LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV** Long and short action noun compound-form, savdnjen-/savdnjin-

* **LEXICON BAHCCI_TV** bahčit. Long and short actio compound-form. No NomAg (Actor) compound, for speller reasons

* **LEXICON BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV** Long and short action noun compound-form

* **LEXICON MAHTI_TV**  Bisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.

## Intermediate lexica for even-syllable verbs

* **LEXICON GOAHTICnj**  for speller reasons to hinder -goahttit, whick is confused with infinitive -goahtit

* **LEXICON RAIMMAHALLACnj**  restricted imperatives

## Basic lexica for contracted verbs

* **LEXICON GILLE_IV**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive

* **LEXICON DOHPPE_TV** Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive

###  BAsic lexica for Contracted verbs

* **LEXICON CIRRO_IV**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e without Personal Passive

* **LEXICON MUITA_TV**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON COHKKA_IV**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive - no stit-deverbal

* **LEXICON GARRE_TV**  garret, loget. with Personal Passive. for speller to hinder garrenávnnas, garrenoaivi etc

* **LEXICON ORRO_IV**  orrot. for speller to hinder orronsadji etc

* **LEXICON MAHTA_TV** Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.

## Basic lexica for trisyllabic verbs

* **LEXICON MUITAL_TV** Trisyllabic Verbs with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON ALIST_IV** Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive

###  Basic lexica for trisyllabic verbs

* **LEXICON COASKKIT_IV**  Trisyllabic impersonals

* **LEXICON ARVVASJ_IV** impersonals ending -šit, -skit, smit, -idit, -ldit, -git and 5-syllables

* **LEXICON ARVIL_IV** Impersonal Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit

* **LEXICON MUITTASJ_TV** Words ending -šit, -skit, -ldit - Reciprocals on -dit, Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit, Frequentatives on -(u)hit, Continuatives on -nit, Inchoatives on -nit

* **LEXICON HALIID_TV** Words ending -smit, -idit, -git

* **LEXICON BONJAT_TV** Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit

* **LEXICON VUORDIL_TV** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit with Personal Passive

* **LEXICON BEAGASJ_IV** Words ending -šit, -skit -ldit, essive derivates on -hit -. !Reciprocals on -dit. Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit. Frequentatives on -(u)hit. Continuatives on -nit. Inchoatives in -nit

* **LEXICON JORGGIID_IV** Words ending -smit, -idit, -git -

* **LEXICON HURAI_IV** Words ending -aidit

* **LEXICON BALAT_IV** !Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit

* **LEXICON SUOTNJAL_IV** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit without Personal Passive

* **LEXICON BOTNJAS_IV** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -sit without Personal Passive

* **LEXICON LASSAN_IV** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -nit without Personal Passive IV

* **LEXICON OAHPAHIT_TV** only oahpahit, disamb reasons?

* **LEXICON NUOSKIT_IV** only nuoskidit, for speller, no action noun nuoskideapmi

* **LEXICON HALIHIT_TV** Like MUITTASJ_TV, without COnNeg so we dont get hálit

* **LEXICON LAHKAN_TV** lahkanit, lahkonit, are nowadays used transitively

* **LEXICON GEAGAT_TV**  Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.

* **LEXICON BUOVVAL_TV**  buovvalit, guoigalit. Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.

* **LEXICON MUITALCnj** Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON HURAICnj** Substems for  Words ending -aidit

## Finite declension

## Present tense

### Vocalic stems

* **LEXICON PotPrsV** Present Tense in Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV** Present Tense in Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV1** Present Tense Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV2** Present Tense Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV3** Present Tense Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV4** Present Tense Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsV5** Present Tense Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

### Consonantal stems

* **LEXICON PotC** Present Tense in Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsC** Present Tense in Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsC1** Present Tense in Contr/Non-Contr Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PotC2** Potential in Non-Contracted Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrsC2** Present Tense in Non-Contracted Consonantal Verb Stems

## Past tense

### Vocalic stems

* **LEXICON PrtV** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrtV1** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Weak Grade Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrtV2** Preterite Endings for Vocalic Strong Grade Verb Stems

### Consonantal stems

* **LEXICON PrtC** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrtC1** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Contr./Non-Contr. Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrtC2** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Non-Contr. Verb Stems

* **LEXICON PrtC3** Preterite Endings for Consonantal Contr./Non-Contr. Verb Stems

## Imperative mood

* **LEXICON ImprtVA**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON ImprtVB**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON ImprtV1**  Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems

* **LEXICON ImprtV2** Imperative Forms for Vocalic Verb Stems and Substems

* **LEXICON ImprtSg2** Imperative Forms For Consonantal and Contracted Verb Stems

* **LEXICON ImprtC**  Imperative Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems - uneven syll.

* **LEXICON ImprtC2**  Imperative Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems - contracts

# Infinite forms

## V- and C-final

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV**  Vowel-final stems

## Continuation lex

* **LEXICON NominalFormsVC**  for vowel final

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV1**   infinitiv, actio

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV2**  gerund, verbgenitiv, verbabessive

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV3**  ^NG^ gerund

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV4**  perfect participe, preterite negation form

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV5**  negation form
